Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-830
Inspection warrant, defined.

An inspection warrant is an order in writing in the name of the people, signed by a judge of a court of record, directed to a peace officer as defined in section 29-831, and commanding him to conduct any inspection required or authorized by state or local law or regulation relating to health, welfare, fire or safety.

Laws 1969, c. 231, § 1, p. 858.